Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2135
Utilities district; collection of sewer use fee for city; payment; discontinuance of service.

To accomplish the purposes of section 14-2134, a city of the metropolitan class is empowered to pay such metropolitan utilities district the charges for such services as set forth in the contract, and such district may discontinue water service to its customers for failure to pay the sewer rental or use fee.

Laws 1959, c. 32, § 2, p. 187;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1109;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 35.

Officials of M.U.D. in complying with statute providing for shutting off services for nonpayment did not violate civil rights statute. Morgan v. Kennedy, 331 F.Supp. 861 (D. Neb. 1971).